Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.435

Definitions.

For purposes of RCW 32.32.440 through 32.32.475, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) The term "offer" includes every offer to buy or acquire, solicitation of an offer to sell, tender offer for, or request or invitation for tenders of, a security or interest in a security for value.

(2) The term "person" means an individual, a group acting in concert, a corporation, a partnership, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, and any unincorporated organization or similar company.

(3) Without limitation on the generality of its meaning, the term "security" includes nontransferable subscription rights issued to a plan of conversion.

[ 1981 c 85 s 86.]